Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 3
ARREST - SEARCHES AND SEIZURES

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 AUTHORITY OF PEACE OFFICER
TO MAKE AN ARREST

PART 2 AUTHORITY OF PERSON
NOT A PEACE OFFICER
TO MAKE AN ARREST

PART 3 SEARCHES AND SEIZURES

PART 4 RIGHTS OF PERSONS IN CUSTODY

PART 5 WARRANTS AND BONDS FOR PERSONS
ILLEGALLY IN THE COUNTRY

PART 6 RECORDING CUSTODIAL INTERROGATIONS